North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 4. Temporary Management of Adult Care Homes.

§ 131D-35.
Temporary management of adult care homes.

The provisions of Article 13 of Chapter 131E are incorporated by reference in this Article.

History.

1993, c. 390, s. 3; 1995, c. 535, s. 18.

§§ 131D-36 through 131D-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.